lib/dict/cs_CZ.aff
SFX A   it          te         [^o]u[bcèfjlmpøs¹vz¾]it
SFX A   t           0          tøit
SFX A   it          eme        tøit
SFX A   it          ete        tøit
SFX A   it          0          [aeiouyáéíóúùýì]tøit
SFX A   it          me         [aeiouyáéíóúùýì]tøit
SFX A   it          te         [aeiouyáéíóúùýì]tøit
SFX A   t           0          [^aeioyìáéíóúùýl]lit
SFX A   it          eme        [^aeioyìáéíóúùýl]lit
SFX A   it          ete        [^aeioyìáéíóúùýl]lit
SFX A   ábit        ab         ábit
SFX A   ábit        abme       ábit
SFX A   ábit        abte       ábit
SFX A   t           0          dèit
SFX A   it          eme        dèit
SFX A   it          ete        dèit
SFX A   áèit        aè         áèit
SFX A   áèit        aème       áèit
SFX A   áèit        aète       áèit
SFX A   ájit        aj         ájit
SFX A   ájit        ajme       ájit
SFX A   ájit        ajte       ájit
SFX A   álit        al         álit
SFX A   álit        alme       álit
SFX A   álit        alte       álit
SFX A   ámit        am         ámit
SFX A   ámit        amme       ámit
SFX A   ámit        amte       ámit
SFX A   ápit        ap         ápit
SFX A   ápit        apme       ápit
SFX A   ápit        apte       ápit
SFX A   áøit        aø         áøit
SFX A   áøit        aøme       áøit
SFX A   áøit        aøte       áøit
SFX A   ásit        as         ásit
SFX A   ásit        asme       ásit
SFX A   ásit        aste       ásit
SFX A   á¹it        a¹         á¹it
SFX A   á¹it        a¹me       á¹it
SFX A   á¹it        a¹te       á¹it
SFX A   ávit        av         ávit
SFX A   ávit        avme       ávit
SFX A   ávit        avte       ávit
SFX A   á¾it        a¾         á¾it
SFX A   á¾it        a¾me       á¾it
SFX A   á¾it        a¾te       á¾it
SFX A   éèit        eè         éèit
SFX A   éèit        eème       éèit
SFX A   éèit        eète       éèit
SFX A   íbit        ib         íbit
SFX A   íbit        ibme       íbit
SFX A   íbit        ibte       íbit
SFX A   íèit        iè         íèit
SFX A   íèit        ième       íèit
SFX A   íèit        iète       íèit
SFX A   íjit        ij         íjit
SFX A   íjit        ijme       íjit
SFX A   íjit        ijte       íjit
SFX A   ílit        il         ílit
SFX A   ílit        ilme       ílit
SFX A   ílit        ilte       ílit
SFX A   ímit        im         ímit
SFX A   ímit        imme       ímit
SFX A   ímit        imte       ímit
SFX A   ípit        ip         ípit
SFX A   ípit        ipme       ípit
SFX A   ípit        ipte       ípit
SFX A   íøit        iø         íøit
SFX A   íøit        iøme       íøit
SFX A   íøit        iøte       íøit
SFX A   ísit        is         ísit
SFX A   ísit        isme       ísit
SFX A   ísit        iste       ísit
SFX A   í¹it        ì¹         í¹it
SFX A   í¹it        ì¹me       í¹it
SFX A   í¹it        ì¹te       í¹it
SFX A   ívit        iv         ívit
SFX A   ívit        ivme       ívit
SFX A   ívit        ivte       ívit
SFX A   í¾it        i¾         í¾it
SFX A   í¾it        i¾me       í¾it
SFX A   í¾it        i¾te       í¾it
SFX A   ýbit        yb         ýbit
SFX A   ýbit        ybme       ýbit
SFX A   ýbit        ybte       ýbit
SFX A   ýèit        yè         ýèit
SFX A   ýèit        yème       ýèit
SFX A   ýèit        yète       ýèit
SFX A   ýjit        yj         ýjit
SFX A   ýjit        yjme       ýjit
SFX A   ýjit        yjte       ýjit
SFX A   ýlit        yl         ýlit
SFX A   ýlit        ylme       ýlit
SFX A   ýlit        ylte       ýlit
SFX A   ýmit        ym         ýmit
SFX A   ýmit        ymme       ýmit
SFX A   ýmit        ymte       ýmit
SFX A   ýpit        yp         ýpit
SFX A   ýpit        ypme       ýpit
SFX A   ýpit        ypte       ýpit
SFX A   ýøit        yø         ýøit
SFX A   ýøit        yøme       ýøit
SFX A   ýøit        yøte       ýøit
SFX A   ýsit        ys         ýsit
SFX A   ýsit        ysme       ýsit
SFX A   ýsit        yste       ýsit
SFX A   ý¹it        y¹         ý¹it
SFX A   ý¹it        y¹me       ý¹it
SFX A   ý¹it        y¹te       ý¹it
SFX A   ývit        yv         ývit
SFX A   ývit        yvme       ývit
SFX A   ývit        yvte       ývit
SFX A   ý¾it        y¾         ý¾it
SFX A   ý¾it        y¾me       ý¾it
SFX A   ý¾it        y¾te       ý¾it
SFX A   t           0          [aeiouyáéíóúùýì]r[è¹¾]it
SFX A   it          eme        [aeiouyáéíóúùýì]r[è¹¾]it
SFX A   it          ete        [aeiouyáéíóúùýì]r[è¹¾]it
SFX A   it          0          [^aeiouyáéíóúùýì]r[è¹¾]it
SFX A   it          me         [^aeiouyáéíóúùýì]r[è¹¾]it
SFX A   it          te         [^aeiouyáéíóúùýì]r[è¹¾]it
SFX A   dit         ï          [aeioyìz]dit
SFX A   dit         ïme        [aeioyìz]dit
SFX A   dit         ïte        [aeioyìz]dit
SFX A   tit         »          [aeioyì]tit
SFX A   tit         »me        [aeioyì]tit
SFX A   tit         »te        [aeioyì]tit
SFX A   nit         ò          [aeioyì]nit
SFX A   nit         òme        [aeioyì]nit
SFX A   nit         òte        [aeioyì]nit
SFX A   ádit        aï         ádit
SFX A   ádit        aïme       ádit
SFX A   ádit        aïte       ádit
SFX A   ánit        aò         ánit
SFX A   ánit        aòme       ánit
SFX A   ánit        aòte       ánit
SFX A   t           0          ¹tit
SFX A   it          ìme        ¹tit
SFX A   it          ìte        ¹tit
SFX A   tit         »          [^ií]stit
SFX A   tit         »me        [^ií]stit
SFX A   tit         »te        [^ií]stit
SFX A   t           0          [ií]stit
SFX A   it          ìme        [ií]stit
SFX A   it          ìte        [ií]stit
SFX A   átit        a»         átit
SFX A   átit        a»me       átit
SFX A   átit        a»te       átit
SFX A   ídit        iï         ídit
SFX A   ídit        iïme       ídit
SFX A   ídit        iïte       ídit
SFX A   ínit        iò         ínit
SFX A   ínit        iòme       ínit
SFX A   ínit        iòte       ínit
SFX A   ítit        i»         ítit
SFX A   ítit        i»me       ítit
SFX A   ítit        i»te       ítit
SFX A   ùnit        uò         ùnit
SFX A   ùnit        uòme       ùnit
SFX A   ùnit        uòte       ùnit
SFX A   t           0          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lrz]dit
SFX A   it          ìme        [aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lrz]dit
SFX A   it          ìte        [aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lrz]dit
SFX A   dit         ï          [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lr]dit
SFX A   dit         ïme        [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lr]dit
SFX A   dit         ïte        [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lr]dit
SFX A   t           0          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lr]nit
SFX A   it          ìme        [aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lr]nit
SFX A   it          ìte        [aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lr]nit
SFX A   nit         ò          [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lr]nit
SFX A   nit         òme        [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lr]nit
SFX A   nit         òte        [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lr]nit
SFX A   t           0          [^aeiouyáéíóúýùìlr]nit
SFX A   it          ìme        [^aeiouyáéíóúýùìlr]nit
SFX A   it          ìte        [^aeiouyáéíóúýùìlr]nit
SFX A   t           0          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lr]tit
SFX A   it          ìme        [aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lr]tit
SFX A   it          ìte        [aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lr]tit
SFX A   tit         »          [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lr]tit
SFX A   tit         »me        [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lr]tit
SFX A   tit         »te        [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lr]tit
SFX A   t           m          [^èø]ít
SFX A   t           ¹          [^èø]ít
SFX A   ít          í          [^èø]ít
SFX A   t           me         [^èø]ít
SFX A   t           te         [^èø]ít
SFX A   ít          i          [^èø]ít
SFX A   ít          ìme        [bdfmnptvw]ít
SFX A   ít          ìte        [bdfmnptvw]ít
SFX A   ít          eme        [^bdfmnptvwè]ít
SFX A   ít          ete        [^bdfmnptvwè]ít
SFX A   ít          ì          [bdfmnptvw]ít
SFX A   ít          e          [^bdfmnptvwè]ít
SFX A   t           c          [^èø]ít
SFX A   t           ce         [^èø]ít
SFX A   ít          il         [^èø]ít
SFX A   ít          ila        [^èø]ít
SFX A   ít          ilo        [^èø]ít
SFX A   ít          ili        [^èø]ít
