lib/dict/cs_CZ.dic
akumulovat/ATN
arestovat/ATN
balancovat/ATN
blafovat/ATN
botanizovat/ATN
bulíkovat/ATN
ciselovat/ATN
čárnout/AN
dálnopisovat/AT
dekatovat/ATN
denominovat/ATN
dezinterpretovat/ATN
dlabat/AJTN
dobouřit/ATN
dočesat/AJTN
doeliminovat/ATN
dohníst/AN
dochroptět/ATN
doklučit/ATN
dokrájet/ATN
doladit/ATN
dolupovat/ATN
domořit/ATN
dootevřít/ATN
doplnit/ATN
doprýątit/ATN
dorozmazat/ATN
doskákat/ATN
dospurtovat/AN
dosvitnout/AN
doąpinit/ATN
dotlačovat/ATN
doválčit/ATN
dovrąit/ATN
dozvědět/AN
drnknout/AN
ekologizovat/ATN
expedovat/ATN
fiknout/ATN
frázovat/ATN
graduovat/ATN
haąteřit/AN
hnusit/ATN
hranit/AN
hustit/ACN
choulit/ATN
imatrikulovat/ATN
inkriminovat/AN
ionisovat/ATN
kabonit/AN
kartonovat/ATN
klíčit/ATN
kočovat/AN
kompotovat/ATN
kontaktovat/ATN
kořenit/ATN
krátit/ACN
křísit/ACN
kvalifikovat/ATN
lámat/ATN
lexikalizovat/ATN
lomozit/AN
manifestovat/ATN
měnit/ATXN
mňouknout/AN
mrzačit/ATN
nabarvit/ATN
načernit/ATN
nadlábnout/ATN
nadzdvihnout/ACN
nahovořit/ATN
nakapsovat/ATN
nakouřit/ATN
nakynout/ATN
nalomit/ATN
namokřit/AN
napěnit/ATN
naprasknout/ATN
narukovat/AN
naskicovat/ATN
nastolovat/ATN
naąetřit/ATN
natéct/AN
naváľet/AJTN
navyknout/ATN
nezvat/AT
obdivovat/ATN
objevit/ATN
oblíbit/ATN
obrečet/ATN
obątipovat/ATN
ocukrovat/ATN
odbočovat/ATN
oddělit/ATN
odfrancouzątit/ATN
odhumanizovat/ATN
odklíľit/ATN
odkulit/ATN
odlítnout/AN
odmlčet/AN
odpalovat/ATN
odpluchovat/ATN
odradit/ACN
odsedět/ATN
odstranit/ATN
odąlapovat/AN
odtlakovat/ATN
odvelet/ATN
odzbrojovat/ATN
ohoblovat/ATN
ochromit/ATN
okounět/AN
olízat/AJTN
omrknout/ATN
opisovat/ATN
opozdit/ACN
organisovat/ATN
oslepnout/AN
osuąovat/ATN
otapetovat/ATN
ovanout/ATN
označkovat/ATN
pakovat/ATN
pářit/ATN
periodizovat/ATN
planýrovat/ATN
pobalovat/ATN
podbarvit/ATN
podchytnout/ATN
podněcovat/ATN
podřizovat/ATN
podvolovat/ATN
pohořet/ATN
pochytnout/ATN
pokouřit/ATN
polemizovat/ATN
pomátnout/ATN
ponořovat/ATN
poplést/ATN
poreferovat/ATN
poskakovat/AN
postrkovat/ATN
poąkrábnout/ATN
potřebovat/ATN
povoskovat/ATN
pozlatit/ACN
prát/AT
proboxovat/ATN
prodrat/ATN
prohlaąovat/ATN
projevit/ATN
prokouřit/ATN
prolisovat/ATN
promočit/ATN
proplazit/AN
prosadit/ACN
prostituovat/ATN
proąlehnout/ATN
protopit/ATN
provlhnout/ATN
přebarvit/ATN
přečistit/ACN
předisponovat/ATN
předpěstovat/ATN
předsunout/ATN
přefakturovat/ATN
přehrabat/ATN
překlepat/AJTN
překroutit/ACN
přelepit/ATN
přemést/ATN
přepalovat/ATN
přeprat/ATN
přesadit/ACN
přestavět/AJTN
přeąkrabat/AJTN
přetlumočit/ATN
převáľet/AJTN
přezkuąovat/ATN
přičiňovat/ATN
přihuą»ovat/ATN
přikráąlovat/ATN
přilnout/AN
připařit/ATN
připomenout/ATN
přislíbit/ATN
přisvědčovat/AN
přitlouct/ATN
přivlastňovat/ATN
půjčovat/ATN
ranit/ATN
regularizovat/ATN
renderovat/ATN
revanąovat/AN
roubovat/ATN
rozcvrnknout/ATN
rozdupnout/ATN
rozfofrovat/ATN
rozhřeąovat/ATN
rozkouřit/ATN
rozletět/ATN
rozměňovat/ATN
rozohnit/ATN
rozpluľit/ATN
rozráľet/AJTN
rozstěhovat/ATN
roząpendlovat/ATN
roztřídit/ATN
rozvézt/ATN
rozľhavovat/ATN
řeřavět/AJN
sbalovat/ATN
sedlačit/AN
sesedět/ATN
sesynchronizovat/ATN
seznamovat/ATN
shýbat/AJN
situovat/ATN
sklopit/ATN
skuľkovat/ATN
smilovat/ATN
snoľit/ATN
spářit/ATN
spoluvytvářet/AJTN
stigmatizovat/ATN
subkategorizovat/ATN
syknout/ATN
ąkytnout/AN
ąvindlovat/ATN
tlesknout/AN
trľit/ATN
ucvrnknout/ATN
uchýlit/ATXN
uleknout/AN
upadnout/AN
úrokovat/ATN
ustájit/ATN
utilizovat/ATN
uvolnit/ATN
vdechovat/ATN
viset/AN
vodíkovat/ATN
vskočit/AN
vybočit/ATN
vydědit/ATN
vyháknout/ATN
vychrstnout/ATN
vykoupat/AJTN
vylikvidovat/ATN
vymrą»ovat/ATN
vyplazit/AN
vypuknout/ATN
výsknout/AN
vystřelovat/ATN
vyątepovat/ATN
vytvarovat/ATN
vyzávodit/AN
vznítit/ACN
zabojovat/ATN
zadaptovat/ATN
zahlédnout/ATXN
zachycovat/ATN
zakonzervovat/ATN
zalaąkovat/ATN
zamknout/ACTN
zapaľit/ATN
zapudrovat/ATN
zasí»ovat/ATN
zasvětit/ACN
zatančit/ATN
zauzlovat/ATN
zavtipkovat/ATN
zbudovat/ATN
zdokumetovat/ATN
zestátňovat/ATN
zhorąit/ATN
zjančit/ATN
zkonstruovat/ATN
zkysnout/AN
zmezinárodnit/ATN
znegovat/ATN
zničit/ATN
zoubkovat/ATN
zpravovat/ATN
zrcadlit/ATN
ztenčit/ATN
zútulnit/ATN
zvýhodnit/ATN
